Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4601 of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
No state or local government entity shall enter into a non-
disclosure agreement with any other entity as part of a settlement
of a claim, whether the claim is the subject of a civil lawsuit or
not, for money damages or other judicial relief if the settlement is
to be paid for with public revenue of any kind.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10743 MAH 01/13/25


Req. No. 10743 Page 1